New Jersey, session 222, S3962.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Receipts from the retail sales of natural gas and electricity for residential use shall be exempt from the tax imposed pursuant to the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). b.    A public utility that provides natural gas or electrical services for residential customers shall, at the conclusion of each monthly billing cycle, deduct from each customers bill the amount that represents the State sales and use tax otherwise due on the retail sale. c.     The Director of the Division of Taxation, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.